Virginia statutes. Title 10.1. Conservation.
Article 2.1. Virginia Landfill Clean-up and Closure Fund.

§ 10.1-1413.2.
Requirements for landfill closure.

The Department shall prioritize the closure of landfills that are owned by local governments or political subdivisions, or that are located in the locality and have been abandoned in violation of this chapter, and are not equipped with liner and leachate control systems meeting the requirements of the Board’s regulations. The prioritization shall be based on the greatest threat to human health and the environment. The Department shall establish a schedule, after public notice and a period for public comment, based upon that prioritization requiring municipal solid waste landfills to cease accepting solid waste in, and to prepare financial closure plans for, disposal areas permitted before October 9, 1993. No municipal solid waste landfill may continue accepting waste after 2020 in any disposal area not equipped with a liner system approved by the Department pursuant to a permit issued after October 9, 1993. Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection N of §

10.1-1408.1

, failure by a landfill owner or operator to comply with the schedule established by the Department shall be a violation of this chapter. The provisions of this section shall not apply to municipal solid waste landfills utilizing double synthetic liner systems permitted between December 21, 1988, and October 9, 1993, that are part of a post-mining land use plan approved under Chapter 10 (§

45.2-1000

et seq.) of Title 45.2.

History.

1999, cc. 584, 613, 947; 2000, c. 308; 2002, cc. 492, 518; 2004, c. 872.

Editor’s note.

At the direction of the Virginia Code Commission, substituted “section” for “subsection” near the beginning of the last sentence.

Effective October 1, 2021, “Chapter 10 (§

45.2-1000

et seq.) of Title 45.2” was substituted for “Chapter 19 (§ 45.1-226 et seq.) of Title 45.1” to conform to the recodification of Title 45.1 by Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387, at the direction of the Virginia Code Commission.

The 2000 amendments.

The 2000 amendment by c. 308, in subsection B, substituted “subsection” for “subdivision” in the second sentence, and inserted the present third through fifth sentences.

The 2002 amendments.

The 2002 amendments by cc. 492 and 518 are identical, and added the last sentence of subsection B.

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendment by c. 872 rewrote the section.

Law Review.

For 2000 survey of Virginia environmental law, see 34 U. Rich. L. Rev. 799 (2000).

§ 10.1-1413.3.
Testing private wells and public water supply wells near coal ash ponds; resident notification.

For the purposes of this section:“Coal ash pond” means any natural topographic depression, man-made excavation, or diked area that (i) is designed to hold an accumulation of coal combustion residuals and liquids; (ii) treats, stores, or disposes of coal combustion residuals; and (iii) is located in the Chesapeake Bay watershed at the Bremo Power Station in Fluvanna County, Chesapeake Energy Center in the City of Chesapeake, Chesterfield Power Station in Chesterfield County, or Possum Point Power Station in Prince William County.“Utility” means the owner or operator of a coal ash pond.

No later than October 1, 2020, each utility shall submit to the Department a complete survey identifying all private wells and public water supply wells within 1.5 miles of any coal ash pond boundary. The utility shall use reasonable efforts to determine the locations of all such wells within 1.5 miles of the coal ash pond boundary and shall not rely solely on records maintained by the Virginia Department of Health or other public records. Such reasonable efforts shall include the distribution of notices that explain the purpose of the survey to each landowner. The utility shall distribute such notices through the United States mail to the owner of each parcel of land any part of which is located within 1.5 miles of a coal ash pond boundary and shall post a notice in at least one newspaper of general circulation in the locality.

History.

2020, c. 625.